Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 1. Short Title, Construction, General Provisions

§ 40-14-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as “Wyoming Uniform Consumer Credit Code.”

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 1-101; W.S. 1957, §

40-1-101

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Lender's Labyrinth and the Banker's Burden: The Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 and the 1975 Amendments,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 383 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes Truth in Lending Act violation which “was not intentional and resulted from bona fide error notwithstanding maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such error” within meaning of § 130(c) of Act (15 USC § 1640(c)) 153 ALR Fed 193.

§ 40-14-102.
Purposes; rules of construction.

This act shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

The underlying purposes and policies of this act are:

To simplify, clarify and modernize the law governing retail installment sales, consumer credit, small loans and usury;

To provide rate ceilings to assure an adequate supply of credit to consumers;

To further consumer understanding of the terms of credit transactions and to foster competition among suppliers of consumer credit so that consumers may obtain credit at reasonable cost;

To protect consumer buyers, lessees, and borrowers against unfair practices by some suppliers of consumer credit, having due regard for the interests of legitimate and scrupulous creditors;

To permit and encourage the development of fair and economically sound consumer credit practices;

To conform the regulation of consumer credit transactions to the policies of the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act [15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq. and 18 U.S.C. § 891 et seq.]; and

To make uniform the law, including administrative rules, among the various jurisdictions.

A reference to a requirement imposed by this act includes reference to a related rule of the administrator adopted pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 1-102; W.S. 1957, §

40-1-102

.

Consumer Credit Protection Act. —

The federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, referred to in subsection (b)(vi), appears as 15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq. and 18 U.S.C. § 891 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

No violation of Wyoming Uniform Consumer Credit Code. —

Company did not violate the Wyoming Uniform Consumer Credit Code in charging fees to consumers who opted to make payments on their consumer credit contracts by phone or internet; they were not credit service charges, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

40-14-102

, and they were not imposed as an incident to the extension of credit, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

40-14-207

.
Vogel v. Onyx Acceptance Corp., 2011 WY 163, 267 P.3d 1057,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2011).

Code to allow state control of credit transactions. —

The Uniform Consumer Credit Code is to allow state rather than federal control of credit transactions, specifically dealing with prohibitions with respect to negotiable instruments. Stevens v. Rock Springs Nat'l Bank, 577 P.2d 1374,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “business or commercial” purpose within meaning of § 104(1) of Truth in Lending Act (15 USC § 1603(1)), exempting business or commercial credit transactions from act, 54 ALR Fed 491.

§ 40-14-103.
Supplementary general principles of law applicable.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this act, the Uniform Commercial Code [§§ 34.1-1-101 through 34.1-10-104] and the principles of law and equity, including the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement its provisions.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 1-103; W.S. 1957, §

40-1-103

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-104.
Construction against implicit repeal.

This act being a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter, no part of it shall be deemed to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if such construction can reasonably be avoided.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 1-104; W.S. 1957, §

40-1-104

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-105.
Severability.

If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 1-105; W.S. 1957, §

40-1-105

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-106.
Waiver; agreement to forego rights; settlement of claims; legal rate of interest; applicability.

Except as otherwise provided in this act, a buyer, lessee, or debtor may not waive or agree to forego rights or benefits under this act.

A claim by a buyer, lessee, or debtor against a creditor for an excess charge, other violation of this act, or civil penalty, or a claim against a buyer, lessee, or debtor for default or breach of a duty imposed by this act, if disputed in good faith, may be settled by agreement.

A claim, whether or not disputed, against a buyer, lessee, or debtor may be settled for less value than the amount claimed.

A settlement in which the buyer, lessee, or debtor waives or agrees to forego rights or benefits under this act is invalid if the court as a matter of law finds the settlement to have been unconscionable at the time it was made. The competence of the buyer, lessee, or debtor, any deception or coercion practiced upon him, the nature and extent of the legal advice received by him, and the value of the consideration are relevant to the issue of unconscionability.

If there is no agreement or provision of law for a different rate, the interest of money shall be at the rate of seven percent (7%) per annum.

The Financial Technology Sandbox Act shall apply to this act.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 30, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2448; C.S. 1910, § 3356; C.S. 1920, § 4131; Laws 1923, ch. 34, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 58-102; C.S. 1945, § 39-1102; W.S. 1957, § 13-477; Laws 1971, ch. 191, §§ 1-107, 9-103; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

40-1-107

; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 2; 2019 ch. 61, § 3, § 3, effective January 1, 2020.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, added (f).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

Interest rate is adopted only as convenient measure of damage

for loss of use of money and recognizes the legislative view that money has value beyond its intrinsic worth. Rissler & McMurry Co. v. Atlantic Richfield Co., 559 P.2d 25,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1977).

Statutory provision for allowance of interest does not precisely indicate its application to recovery as result of litigation.

Rissler & McMurry Co. v. Atlantic Richfield Co., 559 P.2d 25,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1977).

As to recovery of prejudgment interest,

see Rissler & McMurry Co. v. Atlantic Richfield Co., 559 P.2d 25,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1977); Laramie Rivers Co. v. Pioneer Canal Co., 565 P.2d 1241,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1977); State Highway Comm'n v. Brasel & Sims Constr. Co., 688 P.2d 871,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 334

(Wyo. 1984).

Prospective purchasers, upon failure to obtain loan, entitled to interest on earnest money. —

Prospective purchasers of home were entitled to prejudgment interest on the earnest money paid to the prospective sellers at the rate of seven percent per annum from the date of demand, upon the failure of the prospective purchasers to obtain a loan from the veterans' administration, as called for in the sales agreement, and at the judgment rate of 10% per annum thereafter. Holst v. Guynn, 696 P.2d 632,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1985).

Agreement to pay interest must be explicit. —

The mere appearance of a provision imposing interest on an invoice or billing statement is insufficient to establish an implied agreement for the payment of interest. Miles v. CEC Homes, 753 P.2d 1021,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1988).

The payment by a developer of a prior bill, which included interest charges, was merely a settlement of a contract for initial platting services, which was separate and divisible from a contract entered some 18 months later for replatting services. The record contained no evidence to support a conclusion that the developer agreed to pay interest on the replatting contract, which was the debt for which the action was brought. Accordingly, the plaintiff surveyor could not be awarded interest above the statutory rate. Miles v. CEC Homes, 753 P.2d 1021,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1988).

Statutory rate applies absent an agreement otherwise. —

Substantial evidence supported the trial court's determination of interest on defendant's account at the statutory rate, where there was no agreement between the parties, express or implied, to establish a specific rate. Ruby Drilling Co. v. Ratcliff, 994 P.2d 931,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1999).

Prejudgment interest was appropriate in a lien foreclosure action by a subcontractor because the claim was readily determinable from the labor and materials invoices attached to the lien statement. Absent a contractual agreement to a different percentage, the appropriate measure of prejudgment interest was the seven percent per annum stated in this section.
KM Upstream, LLC v. Elkhorn Constr., Inc., 2012 WY 79, 278 P.3d 711,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2012).

Assignee was not entitled to prejudgment interest at seven percent, after maturity, because the parties' contractual agreement to six percent interest applied after maturity. Halling v. Yovanovich, 2017 WY 28, 391 P.3d 611,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2017).

Statutory rate imposed on liquidated sum. —

When no contractual rate is otherwise provided and the judgment amount constitutes a liquidated sum, the statutory rate of interest should be imposed. Bueno v. CF & I Steel Corp., 773 P.2d 937,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1989).

Request denied. —

In his request for prejudgment interest, a fire department shift commander made no effort to show which of the damages awarded in the different verdict categories were readily computable via simple mathematics, at what point they were liquidated, or when the city had notice of them. Under these circumstances, there was no abuse of discretion in the district court’s denial of his request for prejudgment interest. Hanft v. City of Laramie, 2021 WY 52, 485 P.3d 369,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2021).

Applied

in

Burk v. Burzynski, 672 P.2d 419,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 385

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Dunn v. Rescon Technology Corp., 884 P.2d 965,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1994); Platt v. Platt, 2014 WY 142,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Nov. 6, 2014).

§ 40-14-107.
Effect on powers of organizations.

This act prescribes maximum charges for all creditors, except lessors and those excluded (W.S.

40-14-121

), extending consumer credit including consumer credit sales (W.S.

40-14-204

) and consumer loans (W.S.

40-14-304

), and displaces existing limitations on the powers of those creditors based on maximum charges.

With respect to sellers of goods or services, small loan companies, licensed lenders, consumer and sales finance companies, industrial banks and loan companies and commercial banks and trust companies, this act displaces existing limitations on their powers based solely on amount or duration of credit.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, this act does not displace limitations on powers of credit unions, savings banks, savings and loan associations, or other thrift institutions whether organized for the profit of shareholders or as mutual organizations.

Except as provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, this act does not displace:

Limitations on powers of supervised financial organizations defined by W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xix) with respect to the amount of a loan to a single borrower, the ratio of a loan to the value of collateral, the duration of a loan secured by an interest in land or other similar restrictions designed to protect deposits; or

Limitations on powers an organization is authorized to exercise under the laws of this state or the United States.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 1-108; W.S. 1957, §

40-1-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 117, § 1; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a), deleted "and consumer related sales and loans (W.S.

40-14-257

and

40-14-355

)" preceding "and displaces," and made stylistic changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).